Utah statutes.
31A-7-501.   Duties of officers, directors, agents, and employees.

Section 31A-5-601 applies to the duties of officers, directors, agents, and employees of corporations organized and operating under this chapter.



Enacted by Chapter 242, 1985 General Session

